Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-502.01
Rentals; previous use validated.

The use heretofore made by the Board of Educational Lands and Funds of rentals received from saline lands, by placing them in the temporary instead of the permanent school fund, is validated and approved.

Laws 1943, c. 156, § 2, p. 566;

R.S.1943, § 72-502.01.